Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Chapter 203

Formation

48-203-101. Purposes.

Any Lawful Purpose. Every LLC organized under chapters 201-248 of this title has the purpose of engaging in any lawful business unless a more limited purpose is set forth in its articles.

Regulation by Another Statute. An LLC engaging in a business that is subject to regulation under another statute of this state may organize under chapters 201-248 of this title only if permitted by, and subject to all limitations of, the other statute.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-203-102. Organizers and formation.

One (1) or more individuals may, acting as organizers, form an LLC, by filing with the secretary of state articles for the LLC which contain the information required by § 48-205-101 and admitting the initial members. Unless a delayed effective date is specified in the articles, the LLC is formed and its existence begins when the articles are filed with the secretary of state. Subject to subsection (c), if a delayed effective date is specified in the manner permitted by § 48-205-101(8), the LLC is formed and its existence begins at a future specific date or on the occurrence of a future specific event, neither one of which shall be or occur more than ninety (90) days from the initial filing of the articles.

Immediate Effective Date. If the date of formation is the date of filing of the articles, the secretary of state's acceptance for filing of the articles is conclusive proof that the organizers satisfied all conditions precedent to formation except in a proceeding by the state to cancel or revoke the formation or existence of the LLC or to dissolve the LLC involuntarily.

Deferred Effective Date. If the date of formation of the LLC is later than the date of filing of the initial articles with the secretary of state, the organizers or any member may, within thirty (30) days after the date of actual formation, file a certificate of formation which states that the LLC was formed and the date of formation. If a certificate of formation is not filed within one hundred twenty (120) days from the date of initial filing of the articles, the presumed effective date of the formation shall be on the ninetieth day following the date of filing of the articles. The presumption, however, can be rebutted.

If the date of formation of the LLC is later than the date of filing of the initial articles with the secretary of state, the secretary of state's acceptance for filing of the certificate of formation is conclusive proof that the organizers satisfied all conditions precedent to formation except in a proceeding by the state to cancel or revoke the formation or existence of the LLC or to dissolve the LLC involuntarily.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 1995, ch. 403, § 5; 1999, ch. 346, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Delaware LLCs for Tennessee Lawyers? (Richard Spore), 35 Tenn. B.J. 27 (1999).